District of Columbia statutes.
20-322

When mandatory.

A proceeding for standard probate shall be instituted:

(a)

if, at any time before abbreviated probate,

(1)

an interested person or creditor makes a request; or

(2)

it appears to the Court that the petition for abbreviated probate is materially incomplete or incorrect in any respect; or

(b)

in accordance with the provisions of section 20-331.

June 24, 1980, D.C. Law 3-72, § 101, 27 DCR 2155
This section is referenced in § 20-312.
1981 Ed., § 20-322.